Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 92 Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
16-92-14.
Oversight, enforcement and dispute resolution.

Oversight.

The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.

All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the interstate commission.

The interstate commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the interstate commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the interstate commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

Default, technical assistance, suspension and termination. If the interstate commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the interstate commission shall:

Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states, of the nature of the default, the means of curing the default and any action taken by the interstate commission. The interstate commission shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its default.

Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting state shall be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated from the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of the default.

Suspension or termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the interstate commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.

The state which has been suspended or terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of suspension or termination including obligations, the performance of which extends beyond the effective date of suspension or termination.

The interstate commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found to be in default or which has been suspended or terminated from the compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon in writing between the interstate commission and the defaulting state.

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the interstate commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the interstate commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

Dispute Resolution.

The interstate commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the compact and which may arise among member states and between member and non-member states.

The interstate commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.

Enforcement.

The interstate commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.

The interstate commission, may by majority vote of the members, initiate legal action in the United State District Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the interstate commission, in the federal district where the interstate commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact, its promulgated rules and bylaws, against a member state in default. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the interstate commission. The interstate commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of a profession.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 106, § 1.

16-92-15.
Financing of the interstate commission.

The interstate commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

The interstate commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the interstate commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the interstate commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the interstate commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

The interstate commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the interstate commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

The interstate commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the interstate commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the interstate commission shall by audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the interstate commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 106, § 1.

16-92-16.
Member states, effective date and amendment.

Any state is eligible to become a member state.

The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than ten (10) of the states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2010. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the interstate commission on a non-voting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

The interstate commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the interstate commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 106, § 1.

16-92-17.
Withdrawal and dissolution.

Withdrawal.

Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the statute, which enacted the compact into law.

Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until one year after the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the governor of each other member jurisdiction.

The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the interstate commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The interstate commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its receipt thereof.

The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including obligations, the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal.

Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the interstate commission.

Dissolution of compact.

This compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one member state.

Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the interstate commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 106, § 1.